04_Morphology/arn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                   ! Noun 
%<cmp%>                 ! Compound 

%>                      ! Morpheme boundary
%+                      ! Compound boundary (lexical form)
%#                      ! Compound boundary (surface form)


LEXICON Root

Nouns  ;

LEXICON Cmp

%<cmp%>%+:%# Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: Cmp ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON Nouns

mapu:mapu N ; !"tierra, land"
che:che N ; ! "gente, people"
mamüll:mamüll N ; ! "madera, wood"
wangku:wangku N ; ! "silla, chair"
